prince/dictionaries/bg.aff
SFX T Y 94
SFX T   я         0         я
SFX T   я         е         я
SFX T   я         ейки      я
SFX T   я         ел        я
SFX T   я         ела       я
SFX T   я         елата     я
SFX T   я         ели       я
SFX T   я         елите     я
SFX T   я         елия      я
SFX T   я         елият     я
SFX T   я         ело       я
SFX T   я         елото     я
SFX T   я         ем        я
SFX T   я         ете       я
SFX T   я         ех        я
SFX T   я         еха       я
SFX T   я         ехме      я
SFX T   я         ехте      я
SFX T   я         еш        я
SFX T   я         еше       я
SFX T   я         ещ        я
SFX T   я         еща       я
SFX T   я         ещата     я
SFX T   я         ещи       я
SFX T   я         ещите     я
SFX T   я         ещия      я
SFX T   я         ещият     я
SFX T   я         ещо       я
SFX T   я         ещото     я
SFX T   я         й         я
SFX T   я         йте       я
SFX T   я         л         я
SFX T   я         ла        я
SFX T   я         лата      я
SFX T   я         ли        я
SFX T   я         лите      я
SFX T   я         лия       я
SFX T   я         лият      я
SFX T   я         ло        я
SFX T   я         лото      я
SFX T   ям        я         ям
SFX T   ям        яй        ям
SFX T   ям        яйки      ям
SFX T   ям        яйте      ям
SFX T   ям        ял        ям
SFX T   ям        яла       ям
SFX T   ям        ялата     ям
SFX T   ям        яли       ям
SFX T   ям        ялите     ям
SFX T   ям        ялия      ям
SFX T   ям        ялият     ям
SFX T   ям        яло       ям
SFX T   ям        ялото     ям
SFX T   ям        яме       ям
SFX T   ям        ян        ям
SFX T   ям        яна       ям
SFX T   ям        яната     ям
SFX T   ям        яни       ям
SFX T   ям        яните     ям
SFX T   ям        яния      ям
SFX T   ям        яният     ям
SFX T   ям        яно       ям
SFX T   ям        яното     ям
SFX T   ям        ят        ям
SFX T   ям        яте       ям
SFX T   ям        ях        ям
SFX T   ям        яха       ям
SFX T   ям        яхме      ям
SFX T   ям        яхте      ям
SFX T   ям        яш        ям
SFX T   ям        яше       ям
SFX T   ям        ящ        ям
SFX T   ям        яща       ям
SFX T   ям        ящата     ям
SFX T   ям        ящи       ям
SFX T   ям        ящите     ям
SFX T   ям        ящия      ям
SFX T   ям        ящият     ям
SFX T   ям        ящо       ям
SFX T   ям        ящото     ям
SFX T   я         т         я
SFX T   я         та        я
SFX T   я         тата      я
SFX T   я         ти        я
SFX T   я         тите      я
SFX T   я         тия       я
SFX T   я         тият      я
SFX T   я         то        я
SFX T   я         тото      я
SFX T   я         х         я
SFX T   я         ха        я
SFX T   я         хме       я
SFX T   я         хте       я
SFX T   я         ят        я

SFX U Y 158
SFX U   да        дат       да
SFX U   да        де        да
SFX U   да        дейки     да
SFX U   да        дели      да
SFX U   да        делите    да
SFX U   да        дем       да
SFX U   да        ден       да
SFX U   да        дена      да
SFX U   да        дената    да
SFX U   да        дени      да
SFX U   да        дените    да
SFX U   да        дения     да
SFX U   да        деният    да
SFX U   да        дено      да
SFX U   да        деното    да
SFX U   да        дете      да
SFX U   да        деш       да
SFX U   да        деше      да
SFX U   да        ди        да
SFX U   да        дох       да
SFX U   да        доха      да
SFX U   да        дохме     да
SFX U   да        дохте     да
SFX U   да        дял       да
SFX U   да        дяла      да
SFX U   да        дялата    да
SFX U   да        дялия     да
SFX U   да        дялият    да
SFX U   да        дяло      да
SFX U   да        дялото    да
SFX U   да        дях       да
SFX U   да        дяха      да
SFX U   да        дяхме     да
SFX U   да        дяхте     да
SFX U   да        дящ       да
SFX U   да        дяща      да
SFX U   да        дящата    да
SFX U   да        дящи      да
SFX U   да        дящите    да
SFX U   да        дящия     да
SFX U   да        дящият    да
SFX U   да        дящо      да
SFX U   да        дящото    да
SFX U   да        л         да
SFX U   да        ла        да
SFX U   да        лата      да
SFX U   да        ли        да
SFX U   да        лите      да
SFX U   да        лия       да
SFX U   да        лият      да
SFX U   да        ло        да
SFX U   да        лото      да
SFX U   та        л         та
SFX U   та        ла        та
SFX U   та        лата      та
SFX U   та        ли        та
SFX U   та        лите      та
SFX U   та        лия       та
SFX U   та        лият      та
SFX U   та        ло        та
SFX U   та        лото      та
SFX U   та        тат       та
SFX U   та        те        та
SFX U   та        тейки     та
SFX U   та        тели      та
SFX U   та        телите    та
SFX U   та        тем       та
SFX U   та        тен       та
SFX U   та        тена      та
SFX U   та        тената    та
SFX U   та        тени      та
SFX U   та        тените    та
SFX U   та        тения     та
SFX U   та        теният    та
SFX U   та        тено      та
SFX U   та        теното    та
SFX U   та        тете      та
SFX U   та        теш       та
SFX U   та        теше      та
SFX U   та        ти        та
SFX U   та        тох       та
SFX U   та        тоха      та
SFX U   та        тохме     та
SFX U   та        тохте     та
SFX U   та        тял       та
SFX U   та        тяла      та
SFX U   та        тялата    та
SFX U   та        тялия     та
SFX U   та        тялият    та
SFX U   та        тяло      та
SFX U   та        тялото    та
SFX U   та        тях       та
SFX U   та        тяха      та
SFX U   та        тяхме     та
SFX U   та        тяхте     та
SFX U   та        тящ       та
SFX U   та        тяща      та
SFX U   та        тящата    та
SFX U   та        тящи      та
SFX U   та        тящите    та
SFX U   та        тящия     та
SFX U   та        тящият    та
SFX U   та        тящо      та
SFX U   та        тящото    та
SFX U   я         0         я
SFX U   я         е         я
SFX U   я         ейки      я
SFX U   я         ел        я
SFX U   я         ела       я
SFX U   я         елата     я
SFX U   я         ели       я
SFX U   я         елите     я
SFX U   я         елия      я
SFX U   я         елият     я
SFX U   я         ело       я
SFX U   я         елото     я
SFX U   я         ем        я
SFX U   я         ете       я
SFX U   я         ех        я
SFX U   я         еха       я
SFX U   я         ехме      я
SFX U   я         ехте      я
SFX U   я         еш        я
SFX U   я         еше       я
SFX U   я         ещ        я
SFX U   я         еща       я
SFX U   я         ещата     я
SFX U   я         ещи       я
SFX U   я         ещите     я
SFX U   я         ещия      я
SFX U   я         ещият     я
SFX U   я         ещо       я
SFX U   я         ещото     я
SFX U   я         й         я
SFX U   я         йте       я
SFX U   я         л         я
SFX U   я         ла        я
SFX U   я         лата      я
SFX U   я         ли        я
SFX U   я         лите      я
SFX U   я         лия       я
SFX U   я         лият      я
SFX U   я         ло        я
SFX U   я         лото      я
SFX U   я         н         я
SFX U   я         на        я
SFX U   я         ната      я
SFX U   я         ни        я
SFX U   я         ните      я
SFX U   я         ния       я
SFX U   я         ният      я
SFX U   я         но        я
SFX U   я         ното      я
SFX U   я         х         я
SFX U   я         ха        я
SFX U   я         хме       я
SFX U   я         хте       я
SFX U   я         ят        я
